District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.08

Provisions of law may not be waived by agreement.

No provision of this subchapter may in any way be contravened or set aside by private agreement. Any agreement between an employer and employee in which the employee, despite not being an exempt person, agrees to be classified as an independent contractor shall be no defense to any action to recover unpaid wages or liquidated damages.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 208
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.